Washington statutes.
RCW 7.42.040

Matter to be surrendered to sheriff—Seizure, destruction.

In the event that a final order or judgment of injunction be entered in favor of the state and against the person, firm, or corporation sought to be enjoined, such final order or judgment shall contain a provision directing the person, firm, or corporation to surrender to the sheriff of the county in which the action was brought any of the matter described in RCW 7.42.020, and each sheriff shall be directed to seize and destroy the same.

[ 1959 c 105 s 4.]